Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1

Tax Return Preparer Act of 1969

62-29-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tax Return Preparer Act of 1969.”

Acts 1969, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 67-5701.

62-29-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, association, partnership or any organized group of persons; and

“Preparer of tax returns” means a person who, in consideration of compensation received or to be received by the person, offers to perform or holds that person out to perform services for residents or taxpayers of this state that involve advice concerning the preparation of returns required under state law, except the tax on income. For the purpose of this part, a person is not a “preparer of tax returns” when:

It is the person's legal obligation to prepare the return as the taxpayer;

Acting as a regular and bona fide employee of the taxpayer. A regular and bona fide employee of the taxpayer shall be an individual and shall not be an employer in matters relating to the preparation of state tax returns;

Acting as an agent of the department of revenue;

Acting as an agent of the department of labor and workforce development; or

As an employee of a nonprofit corporation or its wholly owned subsidiary, the person prepares a tax return for a member of the corporation.

Acts 1969, ch. 317, § 2; 1970, ch. 490, § 1; T.C.A., § 67-5702; Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 44.

62-29-103. Persons who may act as tax preparers.

Unless otherwise exempt as stated in § 62-29-102, a person shall not act as a preparer of tax returns unless the person is:

An attorney at law, duly licensed and admitted to practice in the courts of records of this state or the attorney's employee acting within the scope of employment;

A certified public accountant licensed to practice as such in this state or the certified public accountant's employee acting within the scope of employment;

A public accountant licensed to practice as such in this state or the public accountant's employee acting within the scope of employment; or

Any of the persons in subdivisions (1)-(3) holding a proper license from another state or territory.

Acts 1969, ch. 317, § 3; T.C.A., § 67-5703.

62-29-104. Declaration of tax preparer.

A person who prepares or assists in the preparing of state tax returns, except those required on income, must sign in the space so provided on the return a declaration, based on all information of which the person has any knowledge and under penalties provided within this part, that the return, including accompanying schedules, has been examined by the person and, to the best of the person's knowledge and belief, is a true, correct and complete return.

Acts 1969, ch. 317, § 4; T.C.A., § 67-5704.

62-29-105. Penalties.

A willful violation of this part is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1969, ch. 317, § 5; T.C.A., § 67-5705; 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalty of Class B misdemeanors, § 40-35-111.

62-29-106. Counties exempt from application.

This part shall not apply to the following counties of this state having the following populations, according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census:

not less than nor more than

5,100 5,200

8,500 8,600

9,500 9,570

10,700 10,800

12,075 12,100

12,300 12,350

12,500 12,550

14,700 15,400

16,000 16,500

17,000 17,500

18,000 18,500

21,500 21,750

24,500 25,000

36,000 37,000

41,560 41,685

52,000 53,000

56,000 57,000

Acts 1969, ch. 317, § 6; 1970, ch. 555, § 1; 1970, ch. 585, § 1; 1972, ch. 451, § 1; T.C.A., § 67-5706.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.